Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-381
Minor child; rights of parents.

In any final decree or decree of modification in an action for dissolution of marriage, declaration concerning the validity of a marriage, legal separation, or declaration of paternity, regardless of the determination of the court relating to the custody of a minor child, (1) each parent shall continue to have full and equal access to the education and medical records of his or her child unless the court orders to the contrary and (2) either parent may make emergency decisions affecting the health or safety of his or her child while the child is in the physical custody of such parent.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 58.